Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5228YC (2) 91 je/ns H.F. _____ Section 1. REGENTS INSTITUTIONS ââ COMPACT FOR ACADEMIC 1 EXCELLENCE IN HIGHER EDUCATION. The state university of 2 Iowa, Iowa state university of science and technology, and 3 the university of northern Iowa are each directed to sign the 4 federal Compact for Academic Excellence in Higher Education no 5 later than December 31, 2026. Each institution and the board 6 of regents shall take all necessary steps to facilitate such 7 signature by that date. 8 Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 9 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 10